Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202632-942
Registered voter anticipating absence on election day; right to vote; method; voter present in county; voting place.

(1) A registered voter of this state who anticipates being absent from the county of his or her residence on the day of any election may appear in person before the election commissioner or county clerk not more than thirty days prior to the day of election for a statewide primary or general election, and not more than fifteen days prior to the election for all other elections, present valid photographic identification, and obtain his or her ballot unless otherwise entitled to vote in the office under section 32-915.03. The registered voter shall vote the ballot in the office of the election commissioner or county clerk or shall return the ballot to the office not later than the closing of the polls on the day of the election.

(2) A registered voter who is present in the county on the day of the election and who chooses to vote on the day of the election shall vote at the polling place assigned to the precinct in which he or she resides unless he or she is returning a ballot for early voting or voting pursuant to section 32-943.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 285;

Laws 2002, LB 935, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 14;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 44;

Laws 2011, LB499, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB271, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB565, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB575, § 21;

Laws 2023, LB514, § 14;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 45;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 20.
April 16, 2026